Utah statutes.
31A-15-213.   Effect of orders issued in U.S.  District Court.

An order issued by any district court of the United States shall be enforceable in the courts of this state to enjoin a risk retention group from soliciting or selling insurance, or operating in any state, in all states, or in any territory or possession of the United States, upon a finding that the group is in hazardous financial condition or financially impaired condition.



Enacted by Chapter 258, 1992 General Session

